Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 52
FALSE STATEMENTS CONCERNING SECURITIES

11-52-101 and 11-52-102. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article repealed, p. 741, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 4 of chapter 125, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1990, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.